Utah statutes.
26-33a-106.5.   Comparative analyses.

(1)  The committee may  publish compilations or reports  that compare and identify health care providers or data suppliers from the data it collects under this chapter or from any other source.  

(2) (a)  The committee shall publish compilations or reports from the data it collects under this chapter or from any other source which:

(i)  contain the information described in Subsection (2)(b); and

(ii)  compare and identify by name at least a majority of the health care facilities and institutions in the state.

(b)  The report required by this Subsection (2) shall:

(i)  be published at least annually; and

(ii)  contain comparisons based on at least the following factors:

(A)  nationally recognized quality standards;

(B)  charges; and

(C)  nationally recognized patient safety standards.

(3)  The committee may contract with a private, independent analyst to evaluate the standard comparative reports of the committee that identify, compare, or rank the performance of data suppliers by name.  The evaluation shall include a validation of statistical methodologies, limitations, appropriateness of use, and comparisons using standard health services research practice.  The analyst must be experienced in analyzing large databases from multiple data suppliers and in evaluating health care issues of cost, quality, and access.  The results of the analyst's evaluation must be released to the public before the standard comparative analysis upon which it is based may be published by the committee.

(4)  The committee shall adopt by rule a timetable for the collection and analysis of data from multiple types of data suppliers.

(5)  The comparative analysis required under Subsection (2) shall be available free of charge and easily accessible to the public.

